Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 14 Code of Ethics

36-14-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the state of Rhode Island that public officials and employees must adhere to the highest standards of ethical conduct, respect the public trust and the rights of all persons, be open, accountable, responsive, avoid the appearance of impropriety, and not use their position for private gain or advantage.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Any person within his or her family” means a spouse and any dependent children of any public official or public employee as well as a person who is related to any public official or public employee, whether by blood, adoption or marriage, as any of the following: father, mother, son, daughter, brother, sister, grandfather, grandmother, grandson, granddaughter, father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, halfbrother or halfsister;

“Business” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, firm, corporation, holding company, joint stock company, receivership, trust, or any other entity recognized in law through which business for profit or not for profit is conducted;

“Business associate” means a person joined together with another person to achieve a common financial objective;

“Employees of state and local government, of boards, commissions and agencies” means any full time or part time employees in the classified, nonclassified and unclassified service of the state or of any city or town within the state, any individuals serving in any appointed state or municipal position, and any employees of any public or quasi-public state or municipal board, commission, or corporation;

“Governmental function” means any action that is public in nature and is performed for the common good of all the people;

“Open and public process” means the open solicitation for bids or proposals from the general public by public announcement or public advertising followed by a public disclosure of all bids or proposals considered and contracts awarded;

“Person” means an individual or a business entity;

“State agency” means any department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, authority, or quasi-public authority within Rhode Island, either branch of the Rhode Island general assembly, or an agency or committee thereof, the judiciary, or any other agency that is in any branch of Rhode Island state government and which exercises governmental functions other than in an advisory nature;

“Municipal agency” means any department, division, agency, commission, board, office, bureau, authority, quasi-public authority, or school, fire or water district within Rhode Island other than a state agency and any other agency that is in any branch of municipal government and exercises governmental functions other than in an advisory nature;

“State or municipal appointed official” means any officer or member of a state or municipal agency as defined herein who is appointed for a term of office specified by the constitution or a statute of this state or a charter or ordinance of any city or town or who is appointed by or through the governing body or highest official of state or municipal government;

“State or municipal elected official” means any person holding any elective public office pursuant to a general or special election;

A person’s natural child, adopted child, or stepchild is his or her “dependent child” during a calendar year if the person provides over fifty percent (50%) of the child’s support during the year;

A person “represents” him or herself before a state or municipal agency if he or she participates in the presentation of evidence or arguments before that agency for the purpose of influencing the judgment of the agency in his or her own favor;

A person “represents” another person before a state or municipal agency if he or she is authorized by that other person to act, and does in fact act, as that other person’s attorney at law or his or her attorney in fact in the presentation of evidence or arguments before that agency for the purpose of influencing the judgment of the agency in favor of that other person.

“Major decision-making position” means the executive or administrative head or heads of a state agency, whether elected or appointed or serving as an employee and all members of the judiciary, both state and municipal. For state agencies, a “major decision-making position” shall include the positions of deputy director, executive director, assistant director and chief of staff.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 389, § 1.

Partnership.

The record yielded adequate evidence to support the conclusion that a former state governor and a local attorney were, in fact, business associates, based upon their mutual acquisition of ownership interest in a partnership. DiPrete v. Morsilli, 635 A.2d 1155,

1994 R.I. LEXIS 7

(R.I. 1994).

36-14-3.
Code of ethics.

Sections

36-14-4

—

36-14-7

shall constitute the Rhode Island code of ethics in government.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-4.
Persons subject to the code of ethics.

The following persons shall be subject to the provisions of the Rhode Island code of ethics in government:

State and municipal elected officials;

State and municipal appointed officials; and

Employees of state and local government, boards, commissions, and agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-5.
Prohibited activities.

No person subject to this code of ethics shall have any interest, financial or otherwise, direct or indirect, or engage in any business, employment, transaction, or professional activity, or incur any obligation of any nature, which is in substantial conflict with the proper discharge of his or her duties or employment in the public interest and of his or her responsibilities as prescribed in the laws of this state, as defined in §

36-14-7

.

No person subject to this code of ethics shall accept other employment which will either impair his or her independence of judgment as to his or her official duties or employment or require him or her, or induce him or her, to disclose confidential information acquired by him or her in the course of and by reason of his or her official duties.

No person subject to this code of ethics shall willfully and knowingly disclose, for pecuniary gain, to any other person, confidential information acquired by him or her in the course of and by reason of his or her official duties or employment or use any information for the purpose of pecuniary gain.

No person subject to this code of ethics shall use in any way his or her public office or confidential information received through his or her holding any public office to obtain financial gain, other than that provided by law, for him or herself or any person within his or her family, any business associate, or any business by which the person is employed or which the person represents.

No person subject to this code of ethics shall:

Represent him or herself before any state or municipal agency of which he or she is a member or by which he or she is employed. In cases of hardship, the ethics commission may permit such representation upon application by the official provided that he or she shall first:

Advise the state or municipal agency in writing of the existence and the nature of his or her interest in the matter at issue;

Recuse him or herself from voting on or otherwise participating in the agency’s consideration and disposition of the matter at issue; and

Follow any other recommendations the ethics commission may make to avoid any appearance of impropriety in the matter.

Represent any other person before any state or municipal agency of which he or she is a member or by which he or she is employed.

Act as an expert witness before any state or municipal agency of which he or she is a member or by which he or she is employed with respect to any matter the agency’s disposition of which will or can reasonably be expected to directly result in an economic benefit or detriment to him or herself, or any person within his or her family, or any business associate of the person, or any business by which that person is employed or which the person represents.

Shall engage in any of the activities prohibited by subsection (e)(1), (e)(2), or (e)(3) of this section for a period of one year after he or she has officially severed his or her position with said state or municipal agency; provided, however, that this prohibition shall not pertain to a matter of public record in a court of law.

No business associate of any person subject to this code of ethics shall represent him or herself or any other person, or act as an expert witness before the state or municipal agency of which the person is a member or by which the person is employed unless:

He or she shall first advise the state or municipal agency of the nature of his or her business relationship with the person subject to this code of ethics; and

The person subject to this code of ethics shall recuse him or herself from voting on or otherwise participating in the agency’s consideration and disposition of the matter at issue.

No person subject to this code of ethics, or spouse (if not estranged), dependent child, or business associate of the person, or any business by which the person is employed or which the person represents, shall solicit or accept any gift, loan, political contribution, reward, or promise of future employment based on any understanding that the vote, official action, or judgment of the person would be influenced thereby.

No person subject to this code of ethics, or any person within his or her family or business associate of the person, or any business entity in which the person or any person within his or her family or business associate of the person has a ten percent (10%) or greater equity interest or five thousand dollars ($5,000) or greater cash value interest, shall enter into any contract with any state or municipal agency unless the contract has been awarded through an open and public process, including prior public notice and subsequent public disclosure of all proposals considered and contracts awarded; provided, however, that contracts for professional services which have been customarily awarded without competitive bidding shall not be subject to competitive bidding if awarded through a process of public notice and disclosure of financial details.

No person shall give or offer to any person covered by this code of ethics, or to any candidate for public office, or to any person within his or her family or business associate of any person, or to any business by which the person is employed or which the person represents, any gift, loan, political contribution, reward, or promise of future employment based on any understanding or expectation that the vote, official action, or judgment of the person would be influenced thereby.

No person shall use for any commercial purpose information copied from any statements required by this chapter or from lists compiled from the statements.

No person shall knowingly and willfully make a false or frivolous complaint under this chapter.

No candidate for public office, or any person within his or her family, business associate of the candidate, or any business by which the candidate is employed or which the candidate represents, shall solicit or accept any gift, loan, political contribution, reward, or promise of future employment based on any understanding that the vote, official action, or judgment of the candidate would be influenced thereby.

No person subject to this code of ethics shall, either directly or indirectly, through any government agency, or through a business associate, or through any other person, threaten or intimidate any complainant or witness or any family member of any complainant or witness in any proceeding before the state ethics commission.

In addition to any rights a complainant or witness may have under the Rhode Island Whistleblowers’ Protection Act, chapter 50 of title 28 or under any other statute, a complainant or witness may bring a civil action in superior court for appropriate injunctive relief, or actual damages, or both and attorney’s fees within three (3) years after the occurrence of the alleged violation of subsection (m) above.

The initiation of litigation by a complainant or witness pursuant to subsection (m)(1) shall not constitute a violation of any confidentiality provisions of this chapter.

No state elected official, while holding state office and for a period of one year after leaving state office, shall seek or accept employment with any other state agency, as defined in §

36-14-2(8)(i)

, other than employment which was held at the time of the official’s election or at the time of enactment of this subsection, except as provided herein.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit any general officer or the general assembly from appointing any state elected official to a senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential position on the general officer’s or the general assembly’s staff, and in the case of the governor, to a position as a department director; nor shall the provisions herein prohibit any state elected official from seeking or accepting a senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential position on any general officer’s or the general assembly’s staff, or from seeking or accepting appointment as a department director by the governor.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit a state elected official from seeking or being elected for any other constitutional office.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the Rhode Island ethics commission from authorizing exceptions to this subsection where such exemption would not create an appearance of impropriety.

No person holding a senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential position on the staff of any state elected official or the general assembly shall seek or accept any other employment by any state agency as defined in §

36-14-2(8)(i)

, while serving as such policy-making, discretionary, or confidential staff member and for a period of one year after leaving that state employment as a member of the state elected official’s or the general assembly’s senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential staff.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a person holding a senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential staff position who has a minimum of five (5) years of uninterrupted state service shall be exempt from the provisions of this section. “State service” as used herein means service in the classified, unclassified and nonclassified services of the state, but shall not include service in any state elective office.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit any general officer or the general assembly from appointing any such senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential member of the staff of any state elected official or the general assembly to any other senior policymaking, discretionary, or confidential position on any general officer’s or the general assembly’s staff, and in the case of the governor, to a position as a department director; nor shall the provisions hereof prohibit any senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential member of the staff of any state elected official or the general assembly from seeking or accepting any other senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential position on any general officer’s or the general assembly’s staff, or from seeking or accepting appointment as a department director by the governor.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit a person holding a senior policy-making, discretionary, or confidential staff position from seeking or being elected for any constitutional office.

Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the Rhode Island ethics commission from authorizing exceptions to this subsection where such exemption would not create an appearance of impropriety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 132, § 1; 1992, ch. 396, § 1; 1992, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 20.

36-14-6.
Statement of conflict of interest.

Any person subject to this code of ethics who, in the discharge of his or her official duties, is or may be required to take an action, make a decision, or refrain therefrom that will or can reasonably be expected to directly result in an economic benefit to the person, or spouse (if not estranged), or any dependent child of the person, or business associate or any business by which the person is employed or which the person represents, shall, before taking any such action or refraining therefrom:

Prepare a written statement sworn to under the penalties for perjury describing the matter requiring action and the nature of the potential conflict; if he or she is a member of a legislative body and he or she does not request that he or she be excused from voting, deliberating, or taking action on the matter, the statement shall state why, despite the potential conflict, he or she is able to vote and otherwise participate fairly, objectively, and in the public interest; and

Deliver a copy of the statement to the commission, and:

If he or she is a member of the general assembly or of any city or town legislative body, he or she shall deliver a copy of the statement to the presiding officer of the body, who shall cause the statement to be recorded in the journal of the body and, upon request of the member, may excuse the member from votes, deliberations, or any other action on the matter on which a potential conflict exists; or

If the person is not a legislator, his or her superior, if any, shall, if reasonably possible, assign the matter to another person who does not have a conflict of interest. If he or she has no immediate superior, he or she shall take such steps as the commission shall prescribe through rules or regulations to remove him or herself from influence over any action on the matter on which the conflict of interest exists.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-7.
Interest in conflict with discharge of duties.

A person subject to this code of ethics has an interest which is in substantial conflict with the proper discharge of his or her duties or employment in the public interest and of his or her responsibilities as prescribed in the laws of this state, if he or she has reason to believe or expect that he or she or any person within his or her family or any business associate, or any business by which the person is employed or which the person represents will derive a direct monetary gain or suffer a direct monetary loss, as the case may be, by reason of his or her official activity.

A person subject to this code of ethics does not have an interest which is in substantial conflict with the proper discharge of his or her duties in the public interest and of his or her responsibilities as prescribed by the laws of this state, if any benefit or detriment accrues to him or her or any person within his or her family or any business associate, or any business by which the person is employed or which the person represents, as a member of a business, profession, occupation, or group, or of any significant and definable class of persons within the business, profession, occupation, or group, to no greater extent than any other similarly situated member of the business, profession, occupation, or group, or of the significant and definable class of persons within the business, profession, occupation or group.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 132, § 1.

36-14-8.
Rhode Island ethics commission — Establishment — Members — Vacancies — Quorum — Compensation and quarters.

There is hereby established an independent and nonpartisan Rhode Island ethics commission composed of nine (9) members appointed by the governor. The president of the senate, the minority leader of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the majority leader of the house of representatives, and the minority leader of the house of representatives shall, within twenty (20) days of July 21, 1992, each submit to the governor a list of names of at least five (5) individuals. The governor shall, within forty (40) days of July 21, 1992, appoint one individual from each of the lists so submitted and four (4) individuals without regard to the lists submitted by the legislative leaders.

Members of the commission shall serve for terms of five (5) years, except that, of the members first appointed:

The individual appointed from the list submitted by the majority leader of the house of representatives shall serve for one year;

The individuals appointed from the lists submitted by the minority leader of the senate and one of the individuals appointed by the governor without regard to the lists submitted by the legislative leaders shall serve for two (2) years;

The individual appointed from the list submitted by the minority leader of the house of representatives and one of the individuals appointed by the governor without regard to the lists submitted by the legislative leaders shall serve for three (3) years;

The individual appointed from the list submitted by the president of the senate and one of the individuals appointed from the list submitted by the minority leader of the house of representatives shall serve for four (4) years; and

The individual appointed from the list submitted by the speaker of the house of representatives and one of the individuals appointed from the list submitted by the minority leader of the senate shall serve for five (5) years.

No member shall be appointed for more than one full five (5) year term; provided, however, that each member shall continue to serve until his or her successor is appointed and qualified; and, provided further, that if, at the time of the expiration of any member’s term, that member is actively engaged in the adjudication of a complaint, he or she shall continue to serve in that capacity until the commission has completed its responsibilities with respect to that complaint.

The governor shall, at the time of the initial appointments to the commission, designate one member to act as chairperson of the commission for a period of one year and another to act as vice chairperson of the commission for a period of one year. Thereafter, the commission shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson. The vice chairperson shall act as chairperson in the absence of the chairperson or in the event of a vacancy in that position.

Any vacancy on the commission, occurring for any reason prior to the expiration of the term, shall be filled for the unexpired term by the appointing authority in the same manner as the original appointment within thirty (30) days of the vacancy occurring.

No individual, while a member or employee of the commission, including any legal counsel engaged by the commission, shall:

Hold or campaign for any other public office;

Hold office in any political party or political committee;

Participate in or contribute to any political campaign;

Directly or indirectly attempt to influence any decision by a governmental body, other than as the duly authorized representative of the commission on a matter within the jurisdiction of the commission;

Have held elective public office or have been a candidate for elective public office for a one year period prior to appointment.

Have any equity interest or ownership interest in, or be employed by a business entity that derives any of its revenue or income by engaging in lobbying, as defined in chapter 22-10 and chapter 42-139.

The governor shall declare vacant the position on the commission of any member who takes part in activities prohibited by subsection (f) of this section. An individual appointed to fill a vacancy occurring other than by the expiration of a term of office shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the member he or she succeeds, and is eligible for appointment to one full five-year term thereafter. Any vacancy occurring on the commission shall be filled within thirty (30) days in the manner in which that position was originally filled.

For any action to be taken under the terms of this chapter by the full commission, five (5) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

Commission members shall not be compensated for attendance at meetings of the commission or of any investigating committee or adjudicative panel of the commission.

All departments and agencies of the state or of any city or town or political subdivision within this state shall furnish such advice or information documentary or otherwise, to the commission and its agents as is deemed necessary or desirable by the commission to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The director of administration is hereby authorized and directed to provide suitable quarters for the commission.

When commission members act in good faith within the scope of their authority and in their official capacities they shall be afforded protection against civil liability as provided in §

9-1-31.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 77; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 29; P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 5.

36-14-9.
Administrative powers of the commission.

The commission is hereby empowered to:

Engage the services of an executive director and of other legal, secretarial, and investigative employees, who shall be bound by the prohibitions contained in §

36-14-8(f)

, and to make such other expenditures as are necessary for the effective performance of its functions;

Separately retain the services of independent legal counsel who shall be bound by the prohibitions contained in §

36-14-8(f)

and who shall remain independent of the executive director and other commission employees;

Prescribe and publish, after notice and public hearings, rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

Prescribe forms for statements and reports required to be filed by this chapter and furnish the forms to persons required to file statements and reports;

Prepare and publish a manual setting forth recommended uniform methods of accounting and reporting for use by persons required to file statements and reports by this chapter;

Accept and file any information voluntarily supplied that exceeds the requirements of this chapter;

Compile and maintain an index of all reports and statements filed with the commission to facilitate public access to the reports and statements;

Prepare and publish quarterly and annually summaries of statements and reports filed with the commission;

Review all statements and reports filed with the commission in order to ascertain whether any person has failed to file a required statement or has filed a deficient statement;

Preserve statements and reports filed with the commission for a period of five (5) years from date of receipt;

Prepare and publish special reports and technical studies to further the purposes of this chapter;

Prepare and publish, prior to April 1 of each year, an annual report summarizing the activities of the commission, including, but not limited to, the:

Number of disclosure statements filed;

Subjects of advisory opinions requested and issued;

Number of complaints filed, investigated and/or adjudicated;

Have a seal and the members, executive director, and assistant clerks thereof shall have authority and power to administer oaths and affirmations;

Educate public officials, employees, and citizens on ethical standards as embodied in the code of ethics by holding regular workshops, seminars, and the like, focusing on the specifics of the code of ethics and compliance therewith;

Create publications to explain the ethical conduct expected of officials and employees.

The rulemaking power conferred by subsection (a)(3) of this section shall be subject to, and shall be exercised in conformity with, §§

42-35-2

—

42-35-7

.

Unless specifically prohibited, the commission shall make statements and reports filed with the commission available for public inspection and copying during regular office hours and make copying facilities available at a charge not to exceed actual cost.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L 1992, ch. 436, § 1.

36-14-10.
Educational powers of the commission.

The commission is hereby empowered to establish and implement an educational program for the purpose of educating public officials and employees and the general public about the ethical standards embodied in the Rhode Island code of ethics in government, which program may include the preparation and dissemination of brochures, other publications and the conduct of workshops and seminars.

The educational program authorized by this section shall be established by the commission in the exercise of the rulemaking authority conferred by §

36-14-9(a)(3)

.

The commission may, by rule or regulation, delegate to its executive director (or other designated employee) such authority as it may deem necessary for the implementation of the educational program authorized by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-10.1.
Continuing ethics education.

The commission shall periodically provide a continuing education program on the Rhode Island code of ethics and related laws for major state decision-makers. The program shall be provided at least twice annually and shall consist of continuing education units as established by commission rule and which may be offered through an interactive web-based format. The commission shall provide participants with certificates showing the date and number of continuing education units completed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 428, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 429, § 6.

36-14-11.
Advisory powers of the commission.

The commission is hereby empowered to issue, at the request of any person covered by the Rhode Island code of ethics in government, advisory opinions on the requirements of this chapter.

Any advisory opinion rendered pursuant to this section must be approved, prior to issuance, by a majority of the members of the commission.

Any advisory opinion rendered by the commission, until amended or revoked by a majority vote of the commission, shall be binding on the commission in any subsequent proceedings concerning the person who requested the opinion and who acted in reliance on it in good faith, unless material facts were omitted or misstated by the person in the request for the opinion.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3.

36-14-12.
Investigative powers of the commission.

The commission is hereby empowered to investigate allegations of violations of the provisions of this chapter and, in furtherance of any investigation, the commission shall have the power to:

Compel the attendance of witnesses and require the production of evidence; and

Take oral or written evidence under oath or affirmation.

Any person, including any member of the commission, may file with the commission a complaint alleging a violation of this chapter. Any complaint filed with the commission shall be a statement in writing under oath which shall include the name of the person alleged to have committed the violation and which shall set forth in detail the specific act or acts complained of. The commission shall, within seventy-two (72) hours of the filing of any complaint, cause a copy of that complaint to be served, by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon any person alleged in the complaint to have committed a violation of this chapter.

Upon receipt of a written complaint alleging a violation of this chapter, the commission shall within one hundred eighty (180) days of receipt of the written complaint complete its investigation; provided that, the commission may, for good cause shown, grant no more than two (2) extensions of sixty (60) days each.

If the commission determines that the verified complaint does not allege facts sufficient to constitute a knowing and willful violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, it shall dismiss the complaint and notify the complainant and the respondent of the dismissal. The contents and substance of any complaint so dismissed, any answer thereto, and the notice of dismissal shall be made public.

If the commission determines that the verified complaint alleges facts sufficient to constitute a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall promptly investigate the allegations contained in the complaint, make a finding on the complaint, and any amendment thereto.

If the commission finds after its preliminary investigation that probable cause does not exist to support the allegations of the complaint, the commission shall dismiss the complaint and notify the complainant and the respondent of the dismissal. The contents and substance of any complaint so dismissed, any answer thereto, and the notice of dismissal shall be made public.

If the commission finds that probable cause does exist to support the allegations of the complaint, it shall prepare written findings which shall state in detail the violations complained of and the manner in which they occurred and shall fix a time for hearing on the matter; provided, however, that, before it issues any findings, the commission shall permit the respondent to submit a written statement and/or to appear in person or by counsel for the purpose of presenting arguments and/or written evidence in response to the allegations against him or her. The respondent shall be entitled to examine and make copies of all evidence in the possession of the commission relating to the complaint. Upon the issuance of any findings, the commission shall notify the complainant and the respondent of its action.

If the commission, during the course of its investigation, has probable cause to believe that violations of this chapter, other than those contained in the complaint, have been committed, it may, upon its own motion, amend the complaint to include the violations. The commission shall, within seventy-two (72) hours of any amendment, cause a copy of the amended complaint to be served, by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon any person alleged in the amended complaint to have committed a violation of this chapter. Any person alleged by an amended complaint to have committed a violation of this chapter shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to respond to the allegations contained therein.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the commission to make any of its investigatory records public.

The commission, upon a finding pursuant to this section that there fails to exist probable cause for a violation of this chapter, shall issue an order dismissing the complaint, and if it finds the complaint to be frivolous, unreasonable, or groundless, the commission shall require the person filing the complaint to pay a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), all or part of which may be paid to the subject of the complaint in reimbursement of said subject’s reasonable expenses of defense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 463, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 256, § 1.